Hawaii statutes.
§431:10-218 Stated premium must include all
charges. (a) The premium stated in the policy shall be inclusive of all
fees, charges, premiums, or other consideration charged for the insurance or
for its procurement. This subsection shall not apply to surety or group
insurance contracts.

(b) No insurer or its officer, employee,
producer, or other representative shall charge or receive any fee,
compensation, or consideration for insurance which is not included in the
premium specified in the policy. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L 2002, c 155,
§45]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next